Georgia, session 2025_26, HB727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to general authority, duties, and procedures of the Department of Administrative
Services in state purchasing, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"50-5-86.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Employment' includes consulting or other independent contractor services.
(2) 'Participates' means involvement in decision-making processes related to developing,
negotiating, evaluating, awarding, or managing contracts for goods or services on behalf
of a state agency.
H. B. 727
- 1 -

LC 60 0126
(3) 'State agency' means any department, agency, board, commission, or authority of the
state, or any political subdivision thereof.
(b) Any employee of a state agency who participates in the solicitation, negotiation, or
administration of contracts for goods or services for such state agency shall be prohibited
from accepting employment with any vendor or contractor involving such contracts for a
period of 12 months following the termination of his or her employment with the state
agency."
SECTION 2.
(a) This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming
law without such approval.
(b) This Act shall apply to any employment starting on or after the effective date of this Act,
and to any renewals, modifications, or extensions of such employment starting on or after
such date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 727
- 2 -